North Carolina, session 2025, SB523.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mind Care for All
Act."
SECTION 2. For the purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Approved providers. – Includes licensed counselors, therapists, psychiatrists,
and community mental health centers certified by the Department of Health
and Human Services (DHHS).
(2) Mental health voucher. – A State-funded certificate that eligible individuals
can use to access mental health services from approved providers.
(3) Pilot counties. – The select counties chosen for the initial implementation of
this act.
SECTION 3. By October 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human Services,
Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services
(DMH/DD/SUS), shall establish a Mental Health Voucher System pilot project in five counties.
DMH/DD/SUS shall select the five pilot counties based on mental health service shortages and
rates of untreated mental illness.
SECTION 4.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental
Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, shall reallocate the sum of ten
million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year from
single-stream funding currently allocated to the five pilot counties to be used to support the pilot
project created by this act. These funds shall not revert at the end of the fiscal year but shall
remain available until expended.
*S523-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services, the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to support the pilot project created by this act. These funds
shall not revert at the end of the fiscal year but shall remain available until expended.
SECTION 4.(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental
Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services, shall use the sum of five million
dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year from federal mental
health block grants to support the pilot project created by this act. These funds shall not revert at
the end of the fiscal year but shall remain available until expended.
SECTION 4.(d) Additionally, it is the intent of the General Assembly to create a
public-private partnership fund to encourage nonprofit and healthcare industry contributions.
SECTION 5. Individuals earning below two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the
federal poverty level that demonstrate a mental health need, as determined by a primary care
provider or mental health screening, may qualify for the pilot project mental health voucher.
Veterans, uninsured individuals, young adults aged 18 to 26, law enforcement officers, and
teachers shall be given priority consideration.
SECTION 6. The pilot project mental health vouchers shall cover therapy sessions,
psychiatric evaluations, medication management, and crisis intervention. Each mental health
voucher recipient shall be eligible to receive up to 10 free mental health visits with an approved
provider annually, with options for renewal based on clinical need.
SECTION 7. DMH/DD/SUS shall recruit and certify mental health providers willing
to accept mental health vouchers in pilot counties and shall provide incentives, including State
reimbursement bonuses, to encourage provider participation. The pilot project shall allow mental
health voucher recipients to use telehealth platforms to connect with approved providers, and
DMH/DD/SUS shall provide grants to community health centers to enhance telehealth
infrastructure.
SECTION 8. DHHS shall collect quarterly reports from participating providers and
submit an annual report to the General Assembly and the Independent Review Commission on
Mental Health Access, established under Section 9 of this act. This report shall include all of the
following:
(1) Mental health voucher utilization rates.
(2) Patient satisfaction metrics.
(3) Symptom improvement metrics.
(4) Emergency psychiatric hospitalization rates.
SECTION 9.(a) An Independent Review Commission on Mental Health Access
(Commission) shall be established to oversee the pilot project evaluation. The Commission shall
consist of seven members, as follows:
(1) Two mental health policy experts appointed by the Governor.
(2) Two representatives from DHHS appointed by the Secretary of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) One representative from the House of Representatives appointed by the
Speaker of the House.
(4) One representative from the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
(5) One mental health provider participating in the pilot project appointed by the
Governor.
SECTION 9.(b) The Commission shall conduct a project evaluation based on the
annual reports from DHHS required in Section 8 of this act. If the Commission determines that
the pilot project demonstrates positive health outcomes and cost-effectiveness, DHHS shall
Page 2 Senate Bill 523-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
submit a plan to expand the voucher system statewide within five years. This plan shall prioritize
rural and high-need urban areas.
SECTION 10. DHHS shall establish a Statewide Mental Health Access Oversight
Panel to ensure transparency and accountability. The Panel shall conduct public hearings and
publish annual project updates. These reports shall be made publicly available on the DHHS
website. A feedback portal shall be created for public input on the pilot project effectiveness.
SECTION 11. DHHS shall adopt the necessary rules and regulations to implement
the provisions of this act.
SECTION 12. If any provision of this act is found to be invalid or unconstitutional,
the remaining provisions shall remain in effect.
SECTION 13. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 523-First Edition Page 3